Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2706
Transfer authorized by will or trust.

(1) A personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer pursuant to section 43-2710 to a custodian for the benefit of a minor as authorized in the governing will or trust.

(2) If the testator or settlor has nominated a custodian under section 43-2704 to receive the custodial property, the transfer must be made to that person.

(3) If the testator or settlor has not nominated a custodian under section 43-2704, or all persons so nominated as custodian die before the transfer or are unable, decline, or are ineligible to serve, the personal representative or the trustee, as the case may be, shall designate the custodian from among those eligible to serve as custodian for property of that kind under subsection (1) of section 43-2710.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 6.